Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2659
Termination of proceeding.

The protected person, his personal representative, the conservator or any other interested person may petition the court to terminate the conservatorship. A protected person seeking termination is entitled to the same rights and procedures as in an original proceeding for a protective order. The court, upon determining after notice and hearing that the minority or disability of the protected person has ceased, may terminate the conservatorship. Upon termination, title to assets of the estate passes to the former protected person or to his successors subject to provision in the order for expenses of administration or to conveyances from the conservator to the former protected person or his successors, to evidence the transfer.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 277, UPC § 5-430.